Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.160

Legislative records—Rules for access to records.

The clerk or the secretary shall, with advice of the state archivist, prescribe rules for access to records more than three years old when such records have been delivered to the state archives for preservation and maintenance.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 8.]